Montana, session 2025, HB208.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 7-1-4124, MCA, is amended to read:
"7-1-4124. Powers. A municipality with general powers has the power, subject to the provisions of
state law, to:
(1) enact ordinances and resolutions;
(2) except as provided in 7-5-103(2)(d)(iv) and 7-5-121(2)(c)(iv), sue and be sued;
(3) buy, sell, mortgage, rent, lease, hold, manage, or dispose of any interest in real or personal
property;
(4) contract with persons, corporations, or any other governmental entity;
(5) pay debts and expenses;
(6) borrow money;
(7) solicit and accept bequests, donations, or grants of money, property, services, or other
advantages and comply with any condition that is not contrary to the public interest;
(8) execute documents necessary to receive money, property, services, or other advantages from
the state government, the federal government, or any other source;
(9) make grants and loans of money, property, and services for public purposes;
(10) require the attendance of witnesses and production of documents relevant to matters being
considered by the governing body;
(11) hire, direct, and discharge employees and appoint and remove members of boards;
(12) ratify any action of the municipality or its officers or employees that could have been approved
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 208
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 208
in advance;
(13) have a corporate seal and flag;
(14) acquire by eminent domain, as provided in Title 70, chapter 30, any interest in property for a
public use authorized by law;
(15) initiate a civil action to restrain or enjoin violation of an ordinance;
(16) enter private property, obtaining warrants when necessary, for the purpose of enforcing
ordinances that affect the general welfare and public safety;
(17) conduct a census;
(18) conduct inventories of public property and preparatory studies;
(19) condemn and demolish hazardous structures;
(20) purchase insurance and establish self-insurance plans;
(21) impound animals and other private property creating a nuisance or obstructing a street or
highway;
(22) establish quarantines;
(23) classify all violations of city ordinances as civil infractions, with civil penalties, as provided in 7-
1-4150; and
(24) exercise powers not inconsistent with law necessary for effective administration of authorized
services and functions; and
(25) prohibit or otherwise regulate:
(a) temporarily or permanently storing personal property on municipal real property; and
(b) sleeping or camping on or otherwise inhabiting municipal real property."
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 208
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 208, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 208
INTRODUCED BY G. OVERSTREET, T. SHARP, C. COCHRAN, M. BERTOGLIO, C. SPRUNGER, K.
SEEKINS-CROWE
AN ACT ALLOWING A MUNICIPALITY TO REGULATE UNAUTHORIZED CAMPING ON PUBLIC PROPERTY
OR FACILITIES; AND AMENDING SECTION 7-1-4124, MCA.